Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.400

Abuse of vulnerable adult—Prohibition on practice.

Any individual who applies for a license or temporary practice permit or holds a license or temporary practice permit and has a final finding issued by the department of social and health services of abuse or neglect of a minor or abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult is prohibited from practicing a health care profession in this state until proceedings of the appropriate disciplining authority have been completed under RCW 18.130.050.

[ 2013 c 86 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 86: "This act takes effect January 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 86 s 3.]